Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-3,104
Legislative findings.

The Legislature
makes the following findings:

(1) At least
by twenty weeks after fertilization there is substantial evidence that an
unborn child has the physical structures necessary to experience pain;

(2) There is
substantial evidence that, by twenty weeks after fertilization, unborn children
seek to evade certain stimuli in a manner which in an infant or an adult would
be interpreted as a response to pain;

(3) Anesthesia is routinely administered
to unborn children who have developed twenty weeks or more past fertilization
who undergo prenatal surgery;

(4) Even before twenty weeks after fertilization,
unborn children have been observed to exhibit hormonal stress responses to
painful stimuli. Such responses were reduced when pain medication was administered
directly to such unborn children; and

(5) It is the purpose of the State of Nebraska
to assert a compelling state interest in protecting the lives of unborn children
from the stage at which substantial medical evidence indicates that they are
capable of feeling pain.

Laws 2010, LB1103, § 3.